Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Land Conservation and  Devel-
opment, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Planning program ..................... $ 16,036,785
(2) Grant programs ........................ $ 5,503,199
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,657,286 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Land Conservation and Development.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$6,666,190 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department  of Land
Conservation and Development.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 9, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5530 (SB 5530-A) Page 2